Ohio, session 136, HB376.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF OHIO: Section 1. That sections 4141.30, 4141.33, and 4141.53 of the Revised Code be amended to read as follows: Sec. 4141.30. (A) All benefits shall be paid through public employment offices in accordance with such rules as the director of job and family services prescribes. (B) With the exceptions in division (B)(4) of this section, benefits are payable to each eligible and qualified individual on account of each week of involuntary total unemployment after the specified waiting period at the weekly benefit amount determined by: (1) Computing the individual's average weekly wage as defined in division (O)(2) of section 4141.01 of the Revised Code; (2) Determining the individual's dependency class under division (E) of this section; (3) Computing the individual's weekly benefit amount to be fifty per cent of the individual's average weekly wage except, that the individual's weekly benefit amount shall not exceed the maximum amount shown for the individual's dependency class in the following table: 1 2 A Dependency Class Maximum Weekly Benefit Amount B A $147 C B 223 D C 233 Effective Sunday of the calendar week in which January 1, 1988, occurs and on each similar day of each year thereafter, the current maximum weekly benefit amount for each dependency class shall be adjusted based on the statewide average weekly wage. Any percentage increase in such statewide average weekly wage between the wage computed for the current year and the wage computed for the preceding year shall be used to increase the maximum amounts then in effect by the same percentage. Such increased amounts will be effective with respect to applications for benefit rights filed during the fifty-two consecutive calendar weeks beginning with such Sunday date. The director shall calculate the statewide average weekly wage based on the average weekly earnings of all workers in employment subject to this chapter during the preceding twelve-month period ending the thirtieth day of June. The calculation shall be made in the following manner: (a) The sum of the total monthly employment reported for the previous twelve-month period shall be divided by twelve to determine the average monthly employment; (b) The sum of the total wages reported for the previous twelve-month period shall be divided by the average monthly employment to determine the average annual wage; (c) The average annual wage shall be divided by fifty-two to determine the statewide average weekly wage. In the computation of the weekly benefit amount, any resulting amount not a multiple of one dollar shall be rounded to the next lower multiple of one dollar. In the computation of the adjusted maximum benefit amounts, based on the statewide average weekly wage, any resulting amount not a multiple of one dollar shall be rounded to the next lower multiple of one dollar. (4) Effective Sunday of the calendar week in which January 1, occurs for calendar years 1988 through 1993, the maximum weekly benefit amount payable for an individual's dependency class for those years shall be computed in accordance with this division, with an additional increase added to the prior year's increase equal to one-sixth of total percentage increase that otherwise would have been available in calendar years 1983, 1984, 1985, 1986, and 1987, if in those years an adjustment in the maximum weekly benefit amount would have been made pursuant to this division. (5) Effective Sunday of the calendar week in which January 1, 1991, occurs, the maximum weekly benefit amounts computed under divisions (B)(3) and (4) of this section shall not exceed the following amounts: (a) For dependency class A, fifty per cent of the statewide average weekly wage; (b) For dependency class B, sixty per cent of the statewide average weekly wage; (c) For dependency class C, sixty-six and two-thirds per cent of the statewide average weekly wage. Division (B)(5) of this section applies to all new claims filed on and after the Sunday of the calendar week in which January 1, 1991, occurs, provided that the maximum weekly benefit amounts established for the dependency classes prior to such date apply to all claims until the maximum weekly benefit amounts as determined pursuant to division (B)(5) of this section equal or exceed the maximum weekly benefit amounts in effect prior to such date. (6) For the time period beginning on January 1, 2018, and ending January 1, 2020, no individual's weekly benefit amount shall exceed the maximum weekly benefit amounts in effect on the effective date of this section March 28, 2017. (C) Benefits are payable to each partially unemployed individual otherwise eligible on account of each week of involuntary partial unemployment after the specified waiting period in an amount equal to the individual's weekly benefit amount less that part of the remuneration payable to the individual with respect to such week which is in excess of twenty per cent of the individual's weekly benefit amount, and the resulting amount rounded to the next lower multiple of one dollar. (D) The (D)(1) In any benefit year that begins before the effective date of this amendment, the total benefits to which an individual is entitled in any benefit year, whether for partial or total unemployment, or both, shall not exceed the lesser of the following two amounts: (1) an amount equal to twenty-six times the individual's weekly benefit amount determined in accordance with division (B) of this section and this division, or (2) an amount computed by taking the sum of twenty times the individual's weekly benefit amount for the first twenty base period qualifying weeks plus one times the weekly benefit amount for each additional qualifying week beyond the first twenty qualifying weeks in the individual's base period. (2) In any benefit year that begins on or after the effective date of this amendment, the total benefits to which an individual is entitled, whether for partial or total unemployment, or both, shall not exceed an amount equal to twenty times the individual's weekly benefit amount determined in accordance with division (B) of this section. (E) Each eligible and qualified individual shall be assigned a dependency class in accordance with the following schedule: 1 2 A Class Description of Dependents B A No dependents, or has insufficient wages to qualify for more than the maximum weekly benefit amount as provided under dependency class A C B One or two dependents D C Three or more dependents As used in this division "dependent" means: (1) Any natural child, stepchild, or adopted child of the individual claiming benefits for whom such individual at the beginning of the individual's current benefit year is supplying and for at least ninety consecutive days, or for the duration of the parental relationship if it existed less than ninety days, immediately preceding the beginning of such benefit year, has supplied more than one-half of the cost of support and if such child on the beginning date of such benefit year was under eighteen years of age, or if unable to work because of permanent physical or mental disability; (2) The legally married wife or husband of the individual claiming benefits for whom more than one-half the cost of support has been supplied by such individual for at least ninety consecutive days, or for the duration of the marital relationship if it has existed for less than ninety days, immediately preceding the beginning of such individual's current benefit year and such wife or husband was living with such individual and had an average weekly income, in such period, not in excess of twenty-five per cent of the claimant's average weekly wage. (3) If both the husband and wife qualify for benefit rights with overlapping benefit years, only one of them may qualify for a dependency class other than A. Sec. 4141.33. (A) As used in this section: (1) "Reasonable assurance" means a written, verbal, or implied agreement that the individual will perform services in the same or similar capacity during the ensuing sports season or seasonal period. (2) "Seasonal employment" means employment of individuals hired primarily to perform services in an industry which because of climatic conditions or because of the seasonal nature of such industry it is customary to operate only during regularly recurring periods of forty weeks or less in any consecutive fifty-two weeks. (3) "Seasonal employer" means an employer determined by the director of job and family services to be an employer whose operations and business, with the exception of certain administrative and maintenance operations, are substantially all in a seasonal industry. (4) "Significantly" means forty per cent or more of an individual's base period consists of services performed in seasonal employment. (B) Any employer who claims to have seasonal employment in a seasonal industry may file with the director a written application for classification of such employment as seasonal. Whenever in any industry it is customary to operate because of climatic conditions or because of the seasonal nature of such industry only during regularly recurring periods of forty weeks or less duration, benefits shall be payable only during the longest seasonal periods which the best practice of such industry will reasonably permit. The director shall determine, after investigation, hearing, and due notice, whether the industry is seasonal and, if seasonal, establish seasonal periods for such seasonal employer. Until such determination by the director, no industry or employment shall be deemed seasonal. (C) When the director has determined such seasonal periods, the director shall also establish the proportionate number of weeks of employment and earnings required to qualify for seasonal benefit rights in place of the weeks of employment and earnings requirement stipulated in division (R) of section 4141.01 and section 4141.30 of the Revised Code, and the proportionate number of weeks for which seasonal benefits may be paid. An individual whose base period employment consists of only seasonal employment for a single seasonal employer and who meets the employment and earnings requirements determined by the director pursuant to this division will have benefit rights determined in accordance with this division, except benefits shall not be paid for any week between two successive seasonal periods. Benefit charges for such seasonal employment shall be computed and charged in accordance with division (D) of section 4141.24 of the Revised Code. The director may adopt rules for implementation of this section. (D) An individual whose base period employment consists of either seasonal employment with two or more seasonal employers or both seasonal employment and nonseasonal employment with employers subject to this chapter, will have benefit rights determined in accordance with division (R) of section 4141.01 and section 4141.30 of the Revised Code. Benefit charges for both seasonal and nonseasonal employment shall be computed and charged in accordance with division (D) of section 4141.24 of the Revised Code. The total seasonal and nonseasonal benefits during a benefit year cannot exceed twenty-six times the weekly benefit amountthe maximum amount allowed under division (D) of section 4141.30 of the Revised Code. Effective October 30, 2011, an individual who performs services that significantly consist of services performed in seasonal employment shall not be paid benefits for those services for any week in the period between two successive seasonal periods if the individual performed those services in the first of the seasonal periods and there is reasonable assurance that the individual will perform those services in the later of the seasonal periods. The director shall adopt rules for the implementation of this division. (E) Benefits shall not be paid to any individual on the basis of any services, substantially all of which consist of participating in sports or athletic events or training or preparing to so participate, for any week which commences during the period between two successive sport seasons, or similar periods, if the individual performed services in the first of the seasons, or similar periods, and there is a reasonable assurance that the individual will perform services in the later of the seasons, or similar periods. (F) The director shall adopt rules concerning the eligibility for benefits of individuals under divisions (D) and (E) of this section. Sec. 4141.53. (A) An individual is eligible to receive shared work compensation for a week in which the individual satisfies all of the following: (1) The individual is employed by a participating employer and is subject to a shared work plan that was approved before that week and is in effect for that week. (2) The individual is available for work and is actively seeking work by being available for the individual's normal weekly hours of work. (3) The individual's normal weekly hours of work with the participating employer have been reduced by at least ten per cent but not more than sixty per cent. (4) The individual has been employed by an employer or employers subject to this chapter in at least twenty qualifying weeks within the individual's base period and has earned or been paid remuneration at an average weekly wage of not less than twenty-seven and one-half per cent of the statewide average weekly wage for those weeks. (5) The individual has been subject to a shared work plan for at least one week prior to the week for which the compensation is to be paid, or otherwise satisfies the waiting period requirement of division (B) of section 4141.29 of the Revised Code for the individual's benefit year. (6) The individual otherwise satisfies the requirements of this chapter and is not otherwise disqualified from receiving unemployment compensation benefits. (B) For purposes of division (A)(2) of this section, an individual is available for the individual's normal weekly hours of work with the participating employer if the individual does any of the following: (1) Works the number of weekly hours assigned to the individual under an approved shared work plan; (2) Works fewer hours than the number of weekly hours assigned to the individual under an approved shared work plan and either of the following apply: (a) The individual takes approved time off during the week with pay, and the combined work hours and paid leave hours equal the number of hours the employee would have worked under the plan; (b) The individual does not take approved time off with pay during that week and the reduction in hours was not the fault of the individual and was not more than sixty per cent of the individual's normal weekly hours of work. (C)(1) Except as provided in division (C)(2) or (D) of this section, the director of job and family services shall pay a participating employee who is eligible for weekly shared work compensation in an amount equal to the participating employee's weekly benefit amount as described in division (B) of section 4141.30 of the Revised Code for a period of total unemployment, multiplied by the reduction percentage specified in the approved shared work plan applicable to the participating employee. (2) The director shall pay a participating employee who is eligible for weekly shared work compensation in an amount equal to the participating employee's weekly benefit amount as described in division (B) of section 4141.30 of the Revised Code for a period of total unemployment, multiplied by the percentage by which the participating employee's normal weekly hours of work were actually reduced during the workweek, if all of the following apply: (a) The participating employee did not take approved paid leave during the week. (b) The participating employee's normal weekly hours of work were actually reduced by not less than ten per cent and not greater than sixty per cent. (c) The increase or decrease in the participating employee's hours above or below the number of hours assigned to the employee in the approved shared work plan was not the fault of the employee. (3) The director shall determine fault for purposes of divisions (B)(2)(b) and (C)(2)(c) of this section in the same manner that the director makes determinations for benefit rights and determines claims for unemployment compensation benefits under sections 4141.28 and 4141.281 of the Revised Code. (4) The director shall round the amount of a shared work compensation payment that is not a multiple of one dollar to the next lower multiple of one dollar. (5) No shared work compensation shall be payable during the one-week period described in division (A)(5) of this section. (D) If an individual works for a participating employer and another employer during the weeks the individual is covered by an approved shared work plan, eligibility for shared work compensation is determined as follows: (1) If the combined number of hours the individual works for both the participating employer and the other employer in a week exceeds the amount of the individual's normal weekly hours of work reduced by ten per cent, the individual is not eligible for shared work compensation. (2) If the combined number of hours the individual works in a week for both employers equals the amount of the individual's normal weekly hours of work reduced between ten and sixty per cent, the director shall pay the individual, if the individual is otherwise eligible, shared work compensation in an amount equal to the individual's weekly benefit amount as described in division (B) of section 4141.30 of the Revised Code for a period of total unemployment, multiplied by the percentage by which the individual's normal weekly hours of work were reduced during the week when factoring in both the amount of hours worked for the other employer and the amount of hours worked for the participating employer. (E) A participating employee is not entitled to receive shared work compensation and unemployment compensation benefits that, when combined, exceed the maximum total benefits payable to the participating employee in a benefit year under section 4141.30 of the Revised Code. No participating employee shall be paid shared work compensation during the employee's benefit year in an amount that exceeds twenty-six times the amount of the employee's weekly benefit amount for a period of total unemployment the maximum amount allowed under division (D) of section 4141.30 of the Revised Code. (F) An individual who has received all of the shared work compensation and unemployment compensation benefits available in a benefit year is an individual who has exhausted regular benefits under section 4141.30 of the Revised Code and is entitled to receive extended benefits under section 4141.301 of the Revised Code if the individual is otherwise eligible to receive benefits under that section. (G) Except as provided in division (C)(2) of this section, the director shall not pay shared work compensation to an individual for a week during which the individual performs paid work for the individual's participating employer that exceeds or falls below the reduced hours established under an approved shared work plan that covers the individual. (H)(1) Except as provided in divisions (H)(2) and (3) of this section, a participating employee is not eligible to receive benefits for being partially unemployed for any week during which the individual works as a participating employee. (2) A participating employee who performs no services during a week for the participating employer and who is otherwise eligible may be paid benefits for being totally or partially unemployed for that week. (3) A participating employee whose normal weekly hours of work are reduced by more than sixty per cent and who is otherwise eligible may be paid benefits for partial unemployment for that week. (I) Any payment of total or partial unemployment compensation benefits under this section is not a payment of shared work compensation under an approved plan but shall be calculated against the maximum total benefits payable to the participating employee in a benefit year under section 4141.30 of the Revised Code. (J) For purposes of this section and unless another benefit year applies to the individual, notwithstanding division (R)(1) of section 4141.01 of the Revised Code, a participating employee's "benefit year" is the fifty-two week period beginning with the first day of that week with respect to which the employee's participating employer first files a claim on behalf of the participating employee pursuant to division (B) of section 4141.54 of the Revised Code. Section 2. That existing sections 4141.30, 4141.33, and 4141.53 of the Revised Code are hereby repealed.